Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1308
Bonds; notes; exempt from taxation.

The bonds and notes of a commission, the interest thereon and the income therefrom, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by this state, or any political subdivision of this state.

Laws 1971, LB 1003, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2608.